Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-708
Flags and flagstaffs; provide; payment.

The governing body of each school shall provide suitable flags and flagstaffs to carry out the provisions of this section and section 79-707, and the cost of such flags and flagstaffs shall be paid from the general operating funds of each school.

Laws 1971, LB 218, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,128.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 382.